data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="επιστ/ήμη__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ήμη</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμη</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμης</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμη</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμες</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμες</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ημών</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμες</l><r>ήμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ζ/ύμη__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ύμη</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμη</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμης</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμη</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμες</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμες</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υμών</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμες</l><r>ύμη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κουζ/ίνα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίνα</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνα</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνας</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνα</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνες</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνες</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινών</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνες</l><r>ίνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σ/άκχαρο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άκχαρο</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκχαρο</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ακχάρου</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκχαρο</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκχαρα</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκχαρα</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ακχάρων</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκχαρα</l><r>άκχαρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ωτ/ίτης__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ίτης</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτη</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτη</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτη</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτες</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτες</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιτών</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίτες</l><r>ίτης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="παντοπ/ώλης__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ώλης</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώλη</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώλη</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώλη</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώλες</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώλες</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωλών</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώλες</l><r>ώλης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="βλαστ/ήμια__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ήμια</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμια</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμιας</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμια</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμιες</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμιες</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ημιών</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήμιες</l><r>ήμια<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ζ/ήτηση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ήτηση</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήτηση</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήτησης</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ητήσεως</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήτηση</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ητήσεις</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ητήσεις</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ητήσεων</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ητήσεις</l><r>ήτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="στρουθοκ/άμηλος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>άμηλος</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμηλο</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αμήλου</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμηλε</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμηλοι</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αμήλους</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αμήλων</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άμηλοι</l><r>άμηλος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ακρίτης"><i>ακρ</i><par n="ωτ/ίτης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αρχιμανδρίτης"><i>αρχιμανδρ</i><par n="ωτ/ίτης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="βλαστήμια"><i>βλαστ</i><par n="βλαστ/ήμια__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="βλασφήμια"><i>βλασφ</i><par n="βλαστ/ήμια__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="επιστήμη"><i>επιστ</i><par n="επιστ/ήμη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ζήτηση"><i>ζ</i><par n="ζ/ήτηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ζύμη"><i>ζ</i><par n="ζ/ύμη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="κουζίνα"><i>κουζ</i><par n="κουζ/ίνα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="παντοπώλης"><i>παντοπ</i><par n="παντοπ/ώλης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σάκχαρο"><i>σ</i><par n="σ/άκχαρο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="σπουργίτης"><i>σπουργ</i><par n="ωτ/ίτης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="στρουθοκάμηλος"><i>στρουθοκ</i><par n="στρουθοκ/άμηλος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ωτίτης"><i>ωτ</i><par n="ωτ/ίτης__n_m"/></e>
